Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
806D]

CRIMINAL
PROCESS RECORDS

Section

806D-1 Definitions

806D-2 Production of records

806D-3 Authenticity of records; verification;
affidavit,

declaration, or certification

806D-4 Service of process issued by or in another
state

806D-5 Recipients' immunity from liability

806D-6 Issuance of criminal process

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next